Massachusetts, session 194th, H2446.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
There shall be a task force to make recommendations on establishing statewide
certification and updating training standards for sexual assault counselors.
The task force shall be comprised of the following members: the commissioner of the
department of public health or a designee, who shall serve as chair; 1 member designated by the
governor’s council, who shall address sexual assault and domestic violence issues; 1 member
designated by Pathways for Change, Inc.; 1 member designated by Boston Area Rape Crisis
Center; 1 member designated by the Center for Hope & Healing; 1 member from the Victim
Rights Law Center, Inc.; 1 member designated by Jane Doe, Inc.; 1 member from the
Massachusetts office of victim assistance; and no more than 3 members who shall be a sexual
of 2

assault survivor(s) designated by consensus of Pathways for Change, Inc., the Boston Area
Rape Crisis Center and the Center for Hope & Healing.
The task force shall make recommendations on: (i) updating the statutory definition of
“rape crisis center” and “sexual assault counsellor” in section 20J of chapter 233 of the general
laws; (ii) the curriculum and number of training hours required for certification of rape crisis
center and program employees; (iii) the curriculum and number of training hours required for
volunteer positions; (iv) the appropriateness of “levels” of certification and corresponding
criteria for each if so; (v) a fee structure for certification; (vi) the feasibility of and costs
associated with establishing and maintaining licensure of rape crisis centers; and (vii) the
feasibility of providing continuing education and college credits with the completion of training
programs.
The task force shall submit a report outlining its findings, along with any proposed
legislation, to the clerks of the senate and the house of representatives and to the chairs of the
senate and the house committees on ways and means not later than 12 months after the effective
date of this act.
of 2